California statutes. Education Code
Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, and subject to state and federal law regarding the privacy of pupil information, the department shall annually post on its internet website all of the following:

(a) The reclassification rates of each local educational agency and charter school.

(b) Statewide reclassification rates disaggregated by grade, disability status, and the 10 most commonly spoken home languages of pupils.

(c) In addition to the data required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 60900.1,
 statewide
 rates of chronic absenteeism, suspension and expulsion, and school stability of reclassified pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 10.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

313.9.

Subject to an appropriation for this purpose in the Budget Act or another statute, the department shall contract for an evaluation of the effects of the changes to the reclassification criteria and process required by Assembly Bill 2555 of the 2025–26 Regular Session to be completed and sent to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before January 1, 2032. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, the effects on all of the following for pupils who have ever been classified as English learners:

(a) The number of pupils reclassified disaggregated by grade, language, and disability status as compared to prior years.

(b) The longitudinal achievement of English learner pupils in English language arts and mathematics, including pre- and post-reclassification.

(c) Core curriculum access, including course placement of reclassified middle school and high school pupils and including, at minimum, a comparison with pupils never classified as English learners with respect to enrollment in core academic subjects, enrollment in upper-level and remedial or lower-level courses, and enrollment in electives.

(d) For pupils who are reclassified in any grade, four-year and five-year cohort graduation rates and rates of completion of courses required to meet the admissions requirements of the California State University and the University of
 California.

(e) The administration of reclassification procedures at the local level.

(f) Engagement of parents in their children’s education and understanding of English learner status and the reclassification process.

(g) Achievement of biliteracy, including receiving the State Seal of Biliteracy.

(h) Reclassification of English learners with disabilities.

(i) The number of long-term English learners and the percentage of long-term English learners who have disabilities.

(j) The monitoring practices of school districts, county offices of
 education, and charter schools.

(k) The quality of English language development instruction for English learners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 11.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

314.

(a) On or before December 31, 2023, the department shall develop a standardized English language teacher observation protocol for use by teachers in evaluating a pupil’s English language proficiency for the purpose of a formative assessment of English learners and for monitoring reclassified pupils pursuant to Section 313.6.

(b) (1) The protocol shall be designed to be used by teachers to evaluate a pupil’s use of English while engaging in academic content learning, including interactive language use with peers.

(2) The protocol shall be designed to allow teachers to assess language practices across a range of
 proficiency levels in order to help teachers identify pupils’ performance along the continuum of progress toward proficiency in English.

(3) The protocol shall be designed to be used for all English learner pupils, including those who have individualized education programs.

(4) The protocol shall be designed for use by content area teachers at all grade levels, English language development teachers, bilingual teachers, and special education teachers, and shall be designed for ease of use by educators.

(5) The protocol shall be aligned to the English language development standards and the performance levels for the English language development test described in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of
 Division 4 of Title 2.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the protocol additionally be useful to all of the following:

(1) Teachers, as a formative assessment tool for purposes of supporting pupils’ progress toward proficiency in English during the school year.

(2) Teachers’ discussions with parents regarding pupils’ progress toward English language proficiency.

(3) Institutions of higher education in the preparation of new teachers.

(d) (1) In developing the protocol, the department shall consult, at minimum, with current content area teachers at different grade levels,
 English language development teachers, bilingual teachers, and special education teachers, and with experts with demonstrated experience in observing and documenting pupil academic language practices and in developing and administering assessments for English learners. The department shall ensure that the majority of individuals with whom it consults are currently teaching, credentialed teachers who regularly instruct English learner pupils.

(2) In developing the protocol, the department shall pilot the protocol with educators and pupils, and refine instruments and guidelines as needed.

(3) The department shall also conduct a validation process to ensure the protocol appropriately assesses the intended target language constructs, demonstrates a meaningful relationship to the
 performance levels for the English language development test and assessed classroom language use, and reflects pupil progress toward attaining targeted constructs.

(e) The department shall provide guidance to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools on the use of the
 protocol.

(f) The department shall develop and make available to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools professional development tools to train teachers on the use of the protocol. These tools may include, but are not limited to, audio and video samples of English learner pupils’ language use for the purpose of assisting educators using the protocol in calibrating judgments about observed language use.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 313.3 by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 4.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Community-Based English Tutoring [315. - 316.]

315.

In furtherance of its constitutional and legal requirement to offer special language assistance to children coming from backgrounds of limited English proficiency, the state shall encourage family members and others to provide personal English language tutoring to such children, and support these efforts by raising the general level of English language knowledge in the community. Commencing with the fiscal year in which this initiative is
 enacted and for each of the nine fiscal years following thereafter, a sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) per year is hereby appropriated from the General Fund for the purpose of providing additional funding for free or subsidized programs of adult English language instruction to parents or other members of the community who pledge to provide personal English language tutoring to California school children with limited English proficiency.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 227.   Became operative on date prescribed in Section 330.)
-------------------------------------------

316.

Programs funded pursuant to this section shall be provided through schools or community organizations. Funding for these programs shall be administered by the Office of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and shall be disbursed at the discretion of the local school boards, under reasonable guidelines established by, and subject to the review of, the State Board of Education.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 227.   Became operative on date prescribed in Section 330.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Legal Standing and Parental Enforcement [320. - 320.]

320.

As detailed in Section 5 of Article IX of the California Constitution, and Article 2 (commencing with Section 305) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 310), respectively, all California school children have the right to be provided with a free public education and an English language public education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 753, Sec. 7.   (SB 1174)   Approved in Proposition 58 at the November 8, 2016, election.   Operative July 1, 2017, by Sec. 9 of Proposition 58.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Severability [325. - 325.]

325.

If any part or parts of this statute are found to be in conflict with federal law or the United States or the California State Constitution, the statute shall be implemented to the maximum extent that federal law, and the United States and the California State Constitution permit. Any provision held invalid shall be severed from the remaining portions of this statute.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 227.   Note: In the text, "this statute" refers to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 300), which was added by Prop. 227.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Operative Date [330. - 330.]

330.

This initiative shall become operative for all school terms which begin more than sixty days following the date on which it becomes effective.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 227.   Note: In the text, "this initiative" refers to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 300), which was added by Prop. 227.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Amendment [335. - 335.]

335.

The provisions of this act may be amended by a statute that becomes effective upon approval by the electorate or by a statute passed by a majority vote of each house of the Legislature and signed by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 753, Sec. 8.   (SB 1174)   Approved in Proposition 58 at the November 8, 2016, election.   Operative July 1, 2017, by Sec. 9 of Proposition 58.   Note: In the text, "this act" refers to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 300), which was added June 2, 1998, by Prop. 227 and amended Nov. 8, 2016, by Prop. 58.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Interpretation [340. - 340.]

340.

Under circumstances in which portions of this statute are subject to conflicting interpretations, Section 300 shall be assumed to contain the governing intent of the statute.

(History: Added June 2, 1998, by initiative Proposition 227.   Note: In the text, "this statute" refers to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 300), which was added by Prop. 227.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. EL Roadmap Policy [360. - 361.]

360.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “EL Roadmap Policy” means the California English Learner Roadmap State Board of Education Policy: Educational Programs and Services for English Learners adopted by the state board on July 12, 2017.

(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   (AB 2074)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

361.

(a) (1) The State Department of Education shall develop a statewide implementation plan for the EL Roadmap Policy.

(2) In developing the statewide implementation plan, the department shall convene an advisory committee with representation from all of the following:

(A) Local educational agencies.

(B) Teachers who teach pupils in preschool, transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(C) Parents of pupils who are English learners.

(D) Nonprofit organizations with experience in implementing the EL Roadmap Policy.

(b) The statewide implementation plan shall include all of the following:

(1) A brief summary at the beginning of the plan that states why the statewide implementation plan is being created and its importance to bring awareness, a sense of urgency, and opportunity as it relates to the plan.

(2) Clear and measurable statewide goals of implementation.

(3) Alignment and coherence across state initiatives that reflect the EL Roadmap Policy and principles.

(4) How to incorporate the EL Roadmap Policy meaningfully within the statewide system of support established pursuant to Section 52059.5.

(5) Guidance for local educational agencies to incorporate and build alignment and coherence at the local level across programs and services.

(6) A system of monitoring and accountability of the implementation of the department’s plan.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall submit a report with the statewide implementation plan for the EL Roadmap Policy to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before November 1, 2026.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall submit an annual progress report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature commencing January 1, 2027, that identifies local educational agencies that engaged in
 the implementation of the plan, including, but not limited to, local educational agencies that contacted the department for assistance in implementation and those that offered professional development opportunities to assist educators in implementing the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   (AB 2074)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. English Learner and Immigrant Pupil Federal Conformity Act [430. - 446.]

430.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the English Learner and Immigrant Pupil Federal Conformity Act.

(b) The purpose of this chapter is to ensure that instructional services are provided to pupils with limited English proficiency in conformity with federal requirements that are designed to ensure that all pupils have reasonable access to educational opportunities that are necessary in order for the pupils to achieve at high levels in English and in the other core
 curriculum areas of instruction.

(c) This chapter is intended to be declaratory of Title III of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) and is intended to assist local educational agencies in understanding the requirements and funding formulas to provide allowable services. It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent federal law is amended, this chapter will be amended to conform to those changes.

(d) The requirements of this chapter apply only to local educational agencies that receive federal funds pursuant to Title III of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

435.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “English learner” or “pupil of limited English proficiency” means a pupil who was not born in the United States or whose native language is a language other than English or who comes from an environment where a language other than English is dominant; and whose difficulties in speaking, reading, writing, or understanding the English language may be sufficient to deny the individual the ability to meet the state’s proficient
 level of achievement on state assessments, the ability to successfully achieve in classrooms where the language of instruction is English, or the opportunity to participate fully in society.

(b) “Immigrant pupil” means a pupil who was born in a country other than the United States and who has attended a kindergarten class or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in a school in the United States for three or fewer years.

(c) “Federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001” means Public Law Number 107-110 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6801, et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1014, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

440.

(a) A local educational agency shall provide instructional services to limited-English-proficient pupils and immigrant pupils in conformity with Section 6801 and following of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(b) In accordance with Section 7012 of Title 20 of the United States Code, each parent or guardian of a pupil enrolled in a public school shall receive notice of the assessment of his or her child’s English language proficiency not later than 30 days after the start of the
 school year. The notice shall include all of the following:

(1) The reason for the child’s classification as limited English proficient.

(2) The level of English proficiency.

(3) A description of the program for the English language development instruction, including a description of all of the following:

(A) The manner in which the program will meet the educational strengths and needs of the child.

(B) The manner in which the program will help the child develop his or her English proficiency and meet age appropriate academic standards.

(C) The specific exit requirements for the program, the expected rate of transition from
 the program into classrooms that are not tailored for limited-English-proficient children, and the expected rate of graduation from secondary school for the program if funds available under Sections 6801 and following of Title 20 of the United States Code are used for children in secondary schools.

(D) Where the child has been identified as having exceptional needs, the manner in which the program meets the requirements of the child’s individualized education plan.

(4) Information regarding a parent or guardian’s option to decline to allow the child to become enrolled in the program or to choose to allow the child to become enrolled in an alternative program.

(5) Information designed to assist a parent or guardian in selecting among available programs, if more than one program is offered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1014, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

441.

A local educational agency that receives federal funds for a language instruction program and that fails to make progress on the annual pupil achievement objectives in any fiscal year shall inform each parent or guardian of each pupil identified for participation in that program, or participating in that program, within 30 days of the occurrence of the failure, as required pursuant to Section 7012 (b) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1014, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

442.

In accordance with Section 6824 (d) of Title 20 of the United States Code, a local educational agency that experiences a significant increase, as determined by the State Department of Education, in the number of immigrant pupils in comparison to the average of the preceding two years may be eligible for a federal subgrant if that local educational agency agrees to expend the funds to improve the education of immigrant pupils by assisting the pupils to learn English and meet challenging state academic content and pupil achievement standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1014, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

443.

(a) In accordance with Section 6826 of Title 20 of the United States Code, an eligible local educational agency desiring a subgrant pursuant to Section 6824 of Title 20 of the United States Code shall submit a plan to the State Department of Education at the time, in the manner, and containing the information, that the State Department of Education may require.

(b) The plan submitted shall do the following:

(1) Describe
 the programs and activities to be developed, implemented, and administered.

(2) Describe how the agency will use the subgrant funds to meet all annual measurable achievement objectives for limited-English-proficient pupils in English proficiency and in meeting challenging state academic content and pupil academic achievement standards.

(3) Describe how the agency will hold elementary schools and secondary schools accountable for all of the following:

(A) Meeting the annual measurable achievement objectives.

(B) Making adequate yearly progress for limited-English-proficient pupils.

(C) Annually measuring the English proficiency of limited-English-proficient pupils so that pupils served
 develop proficiency in English while meeting state academic content and pupil academic achievement standards.

(4) Describe how the agency will promote parental and community participation in programs for limited-English-proficient pupils.

(5) Contain an assurance that the agency consulted with teachers, researchers, school administrators, and parents, and, if appropriate, with education-related community groups and nonprofit organizations, and institutions of higher education, in developing the plan.

(6) Describe how language instruction education programs carried out under the subgrant will ensure that limited-English-proficient pupils being served by the programs develop English proficiency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1014, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

444.

In accordance with Section 6826 (c) of Title 20 of the United States Code, a local educational agency that receives a federal subgrant pursuant to Sections 6801 and following of Title 20 of the United States Code shall include in its plan a certification that all teachers in any language instruction education program for limited-English-proficient pupils that is, or will be, funded under Part A of Title III of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 are fluent in English and any other language used for instruction, including having written and oral communication
 skills.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1014, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

445.

In accordance with Section 6846 of Title 20 of the United States Code, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to negate or supersede state law or the legal authority under state law of the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1014, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

446.

In compliance with Section 6824 of Title 20 of the United States Code, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may not award a subgrant in an amount that is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A local educational agency may form a consortium with one or more other local educational agencies to apply for Title III funds as a consortium, if the grant to the consortium is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more. A consortium shall include only those entities specified by Section 6871 of Title 20 of the United States Code. If a consortium applies for a subgrant,
 it shall be awarded to the local lead educational agency on behalf of all of the members of the consortium. The members of the consortium shall collectively develop and approve a memorandum of understanding for the implementation of the programs and services they will provide with these funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 2. COUNTY EDUCATIONAL AGENCIES [1000. - 2603.]



  CHAPTER 1. County Boards of Education [1000. - 1097.]



  ARTICLE 1. Election, Jurisdiction, Organization and Procedure [1000. - 1017.]

1000.

(a) Except in a city and county, there shall be a county board of education, which shall, except as provided in subdivision (b), consist of five or seven regular members to be determined by the county committee on school district organization. Each regular member of the board shall be an elector of the trustee area that the regular member represents, and shall be elected by the electors of the trustee area. In chartered counties, the manner of selection of the county board of education shall be prescribed in
 the county charter, or by the county board of supervisors. In a county unified school district or in a unified or elementary school district that includes all of the territory over which a county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction, the governing board of the district shall serve as the county board of education.

(b) (1) There may be submitted to the county board of education of a county maintaining one or more high schools a pupil petition requesting the county board of education to appoint one or more pupil members to the county board of education pursuant to this section.

(2) The petition shall contain the signatures of either (A) not less than 500 pupils regularly enrolled in high schools that are under the jurisdiction of the county board of education, or (B) not less than 10 percent of the number of pupils regularly enrolled in high schools that
 are under the jurisdiction of the county board of education, whichever is less. Each fiscal year, and within 60 days of receipt of a petition for pupil representation, or at its next regularly scheduled meeting if no meeting is held within those 60 days, the county board of education shall order the inclusion within the membership of the county board of education, in addition to the number of regular members otherwise prescribed, of at least one pupil member. The county board of education may order the inclusion of more than one pupil member.

(3) Upon receipt of a petition for pupil representation, the county board of education shall, commencing July 1, 2023, and each year thereafter, order the inclusion within the membership of the county board of education, in addition to the number of
 regular members otherwise prescribed, of at least one pupil member. The county board of education may order the inclusion of more than one pupil member. The county board of education may appoint a pupil to serve as an alternate pupil member who would fulfill all duties and have the same rights as a pupil member if the county board of education determines the pupil member is not fulfilling their duties. If the county board of education appoints an alternate pupil member, the county board of education shall suspend the prior pupil member’s rights and privileges related to service on the county board of education.

(4) (A) A pupil member of the county board of education shall have preferential voting rights.

(B) Preferential voting, as used in this section, means a formal expression of opinion that is recorded in the
 minutes and cast before the official vote of the county board of education. A preferential vote shall not serve in determining the final numerical outcome of a vote. No preferential vote shall be solicited on matters subject to closed session discussion.

(5) The county board of education may adopt a resolution authorizing the pupil member or members to make motions that may be acted upon by the county board of education, except on matters dealing with employer-employee relations pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(6) (A) Each pupil member shall have the right to attend each and all meetings of the county board of education, except closed sessions.

(B) (i) Each pupil member shall be appointed to
 subcommittees of the county board of education in the same manner as regular members.

(ii) Each pupil member shall be made aware of the time commitment required to participate in subcommittee meetings and work, and may decline an appointment to a subcommittee.

(iii) Subcommittee meetings may be scheduled in accordance with the availability of all members, including each pupil member.

(7) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a pupil selected to serve as a pupil member of the county
 board of education shall be enrolled in a high school that is under the jurisdiction of the county board of education, may be less than 18 years of age, and shall be chosen by the pupils enrolled in the high school or high schools of the county in accordance with policies and procedures prescribed by the county board of education. The term of a pupil member shall be one year, commencing on July 1 of each year, except that the term of a pupil member may be adjusted only in cases where a vacancy occurs or to provide more pupils with an opportunity to serve on the county board of education.

(B) A pupil who is enrolled in a high school that is under the jurisdiction of a school district, and who may be less than 18 years of age, or a pupil who is enrolled in a high school that is under the jurisdiction of the county board of education, and who may be less than 18
 years of age, may be selected to serve as a pupil member of the county board of education as specified in subparagraph (A) if no petition is submitted to select a pupil who is enrolled in a high school that is under the jurisdiction of the county board of education.

(8) A pupil member shall be entitled to the mileage allowance to the same extent as regular members, and may receive compensation as specified in subdivision
 (h) of Section 1090.

(9) (A) A pupil member shall be seated with the regular members of the county board of education, and shall be recognized as a full member of the county board of education at the meetings, including receiving all open meeting materials presented to the
 regular members at the same time the materials are presented to the regular members, being invited to staff briefings of regular members, or being provided a separate staff briefing within the same timeframe as the staff briefing of regular members, being invited to attend other functions of the county board of education, such as forums, meetings with pupils and parents,
 and other general assemblies, and participating in the questioning of witnesses and the discussion of issues.

(B) A pupil member shall also receive all materials received by regular members between open meetings, except for materials that pertain to closed session items.

(10) A pupil member shall not be included in determining the vote required to carry any measure before the county board of education.

(11) A pupil member shall not be liable for any acts of the county board of education.

(12) A majority vote of all voting
 regular members shall be required to approve a motion to eliminate a pupil member position from the county board of education. The motion shall be listed as a public agenda item for a meeting of the county board of education before the motion is voted upon.

(13) The policies and procedures for the selection of pupils to serve on the county board of education shall ensure and protect the privacy of each pupil, and of the parents or guardians of each pupil, involved in proceedings before the county board of education acting in its capacity as an appellate body.

(c) Pupil members of a county board of education shall not be considered members of a legislative body or a local agency for purposes of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(d) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Pupil member” means a pupil board member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) “Regular member” means a board member elected or selected pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 417)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.

(a) In those counties where the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over a school district situated in two or more counties, any qualified elector residing in the part of the school district situated in a county whose county superintendent of schools does not have jurisdiction of that school district shall be eligible to vote for one or more members of the county board of education of the county whose county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the school district. Each such elector shall be eligible to vote for the member of the county board of education representing the trustee area of that county having jurisdiction as designated by the county committee on school district organization. The committee shall apportion the portion of the school district territory not situated in the county having jurisdiction to one or more trustee areas of the other county so that that territory shall, insofar as possible, be represented as if it were situated in the county having jurisdiction. The territory so apportioned shall not become a part of the trustee area to which apportioned for any other purpose. As used in this subdivision, “school district” means any joint union elementary school district, joint union high school district, or joint unified school district, but does not include any community college district.

(b) Any person who is a resident of a county and is made eligible to vote for the county board of education of another county pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be eligible to vote for the county board of education of the county of which he or she is a resident. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subdivision, a person shall be eligible to vote for both county boards of education if he or she is a resident of an elementary school district of any type that is included in a joint union high school district and the elementary school district and the joint union high school district are each under the jurisdiction of different county superintendents of schools.

(c) “County,” for purposes of this section, includes any county other than a charter county for which the charter specifies that this section does not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

(a) Upon being so requested by the county board of education, the county committee on school district organization, by a two-thirds vote of the members, may either change the boundaries of any or all of the trustee areas of the county pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) of Division 21 of the Elections Code, or propose to increase or decrease the number of members of the county board of education, or both.

(b) Following each decennial federal census, the county committee shall adopt trustee area boundaries pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(c) Except as to the redistricting deadline provided in Section 21140 of the Elections Code, changes in trustee area boundaries or a proposed reduction in the number of county board of education members shall be made in writing and filed with the county board of supervisors not later than the first day of March of any school year.

(d) Whenever the boundaries of trustee areas are changed so as to be coterminous with those of supervisorial districts of the county, excluding any part of a trustee area that is outside of the county pursuant to Section 1001, the election for members of the county board of education shall be consolidated with the countywide election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 3.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

When a county committee on school district organization proposes to reduce from seven to five or increase from five to seven the number of members of the county board of education, the county committee shall call and conduct a hearing on the matter. At the conclusion of the hearing, the county committee shall, by resolution, approve or disapprove the proposal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.

The resolution of the county committee approving a reduction or increase in the number of members of the county board of education shall constitute an order of election, and the proposal shall be presented to the electors of the county not later than the next succeeding election for members of the county board of education. The ballot shall contain the following words, as appropriate: “Shall the number of members of the county board of education be decreased (increased) from seven (five) to five (seven)?” To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the measure. If
 the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 1.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 1000, the term of office of any member of a county board of education who has been elected and whose term of office has not expired shall not be affected by any change in the boundaries of the area from which the member was elected and that member shall continue to represent the constituents residing in the area boundaries from which the member was elected for the duration of that term of office. This section does not prevent a board from assigning a trustee or county office of education official to provide constituent services to residents of an area that is temporarily not represented by a trustee due to redistricting.

(b) At the first election for a member of the county board of education following adoption of the boundaries of trustee areas, excluding a special election to fill a vacancy or a recall election, a member shall be elected for each area under the new trustee area plan that has the same district number as a trustee area whose incumbent’s term is due to expire.

(c) For a county board of education employing both a primary and a general election, a change in the boundaries of a trustee area shall not be made between the direct primary election and the general election.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 5.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.

(a) Any registered voter is eligible to be a member of the county board of education except the county superintendent of schools or any member of his or her staff, or any employee of a school district that is within the jurisdiction of the county board of education.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the county board of education may adopt or the residents of the county may propose, by initiative, a proposal to limit or repeal a limit on the number of terms a member of the county board of education may serve on the county board of education. Any proposal to limit the number of terms a member of the county board of education may serve on the county board of education shall apply
 prospectively only and shall not become operative unless it is submitted to the electors of the county at a regularly scheduled election and a majority of the votes cast on the question favor the adoption of the proposal.

(c) An initiative measure proposed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be subject to the procedures set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9100) of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   (AB 1662)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1007.
